Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1794YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 258 Section 1. Section 28M.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A county with a population in excess of one hundred 3 seventy-five fifty thousand and participating cities may 4 create, by chapter 28E agreement, a regional transit district 5 in the county pursuant to this chapter . Two or more contiguous 6 counties and participating cities may create, by chapter 7 28E agreement, a regional transit district pursuant to this 8 chapter if one of the counties has a population in excess of 9 one hundred seventy-five fifty thousand. A district shall 10 consist of the unincorporated area of any participating county 11 and the incorporated area of any city in the county that does 12 not have an urban transit system. However, a city without an 13 urban transit system may decline, by resolution forwarded to 14 the board of supervisors, to participate in a regional transit 15 district. 16